Utah statutes.
17-27a-203.   Notice of intent to prepare a general plan or comprehensive
general plan amendments in certain counties.
(1)  Before preparing a proposed general plan or a comprehensive general plan
amendment, each county of the first or second class shall provide ten calendar
days notice of its intent to prepare a proposed general plan or a
comprehensive general plan amendment:
(a)  to each affected entity;
(b)  to the Automated Geographic Reference Center created in Section
63F-1-506;
(c)  to the association of governments, established pursuant to an interlocal
agreement under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, of which the
county is a member; and
(d)  on the Utah Public Notice Website created under Section 63F-1-701.
(2)  Each notice under Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  indicate that the county intends to prepare a general plan or a
comprehensive general plan amendment, as the case may be;
(b)  describe or provide a map of the geographic area that will be affected by
the general plan or amendment;
(c)  be sent by mail, e-mail, or other effective means;
(d)  invite the affected entities to provide information for the county to
consider in the process of preparing, adopting, and implementing a general
plan or amendment concerning:
(i)  impacts that the use of land proposed in the proposed general plan or
amendment may have; and
(ii)  uses of land within the county that the affected entity is considering
that may conflict with the proposed general plan or amendment; and
(e)  include the address of an Internet website, if the county has one, and
the name and telephone number of a person where more information can be
obtained concerning the county's proposed general plan or amendment.
